Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1707
Disposable income, defined.

Disposable income shall mean that part of the income of any individual remaining after the deduction from such income of any amounts required by law to be withheld, excepting the amounts required to be deducted and withheld pursuant to the Income Withholding for Child Support Act or those provisions of law allowing garnishment, attachment, or execution.

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 27.